Maryland, session 2026, HB0574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0574*

HOUSE BILL 574
3–1009.
(A) THERE IS A PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY TEEN PREGNANCY SUPPORT
PROGRAM.
(B) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BOARD SHALL ASSIST STUDENTS WHO
ARE EXPECTING TO BECOME, OR HAVE BECOME, A PARENT TO A CHILD WHILE
ATTENDING A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY BY PROVIDING TO STUDENTS:
(1) CASH VOUCHERS TO ASSIST IN PAYING FOR CHILD CARE
EXPENSES;
(2) PARENTING EDUCATION; AND
(3) OTHER RESOURCES THAT SUPPORT FIRST–TIME PARENTS.
(C) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BOARD SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR PROVIDING THE SUPPORT
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) USE THE REVENUE FROM THE FEES COLLECTED AND REMITTED
UNDER § 12–103.1 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE TO FUND THE SUPPORT
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Family Law
12–103.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE COURT IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL COLLECT A FEE OF $100 IN ANY CASE IN WHICH
AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) APPLIES FOR A DECREE OR MODIFICATION OF A DECREE OF CHILD
SUPPORT; OR
(2) FILES ANY FORM OF PROCEEDING TO RECOVER ARREARAGES OF
OR TO ENFORCE A DECREE OF CHILD SUPPORT.
(C) THE REVENUE GENERATED FROM THE FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE REMITTED QUARTERLY TO THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY

HOUSE BILL 574 3
BOARD OF EDUCATION AND USED TO SUPPORT THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
TEEN PREGNANCY SUPPORT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–1009 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(D) THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION IS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER
FEES OR COSTS IMPOSED UNDER LAW, REGULATION, OR RULE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.